hr-HR: Način ugradnje ručice mjenjača: Stezaljka; Čahura bez navoja; Utiskivanje / pritiskanje; Vijak za fiksiranje; S navojem; Okretno zaključavanje; Drugo
pt-BR: Manopla de câmbio método de instalação: Abraçadeira; Luva sem rosca; Pressão / encaixe; Parafuso de fixação; Rosqueado; Trava de torção; Outro
fi: Vaihdekepin nupin asennusmenetelmä: Kiristettävä; Kierteetön holkki; Painettava; Pidätinruuvi; Kierteinen; Kääntölukko; Muu
zh-CN: 换挡旋钮安装方式: 夹紧式; 无螺纹套管; 压入式/推入式; 紧定螺丝; 螺纹式; 扭锁式; 其他
cs: Způsob instalace řadicí páky: Na svorku; Nezávitové pouzdro; Nalisovací / nasunovací; Zajišťovací šroub; Závitové; Otočný zámek; Jiné
nb: Monteringsmetode for girspaken: Klemme; Ugjenget hylse; Press-på / trykk-på; Settskrue; Gjenget; Vrilås; Annet
el: Μέθοδος εγκατάστασης πόμολου ταχυτήτων: Με σφιγκτήρα; Χιτώνιο χωρίς σπείρωμα; Πρεσαριστό / κουμπωτό; Βίδα στερέωσης; Με σπείρωμα; Περιστροφική ασφάλιση; Άλλο
fr: Mode de fixation du pommeau de levier de vitesses: À serrage; Manchon non fileté; À enfoncer; Vis de pression; Fileté; Verrouillage par rotation; Autre
ru: Способ установки рукоятки переключения передач: На зажимах; Втулка без резьбы; Напрессовка / насадка; Установочный винт; На резьбе; Поворотный замок; Другое
ko: 기어 변속 손잡이 설치 방법: 클램프온; 비나사형 슬리브; 프레스온/푸시온; 고정 나사; 나사형; 트위스트락; 기타
de: Montagemethode des Schaltknaufs: Zum Klemmen; Hülse ohne Gewinde; Zum Aufdrücken; Madenschraube; Mit Gewinde; Drehverschluss; Sonstige
zh-TW: 排檔頭安裝方式: 夾緊式; 無螺紋套筒; 壓入式/推入式; 止付螺絲; 螺紋式; 旋鎖式; 其他
es: Método de instalación de la palanca de cambios: Con abrazadera; Funda sin rosca; A presión; Tornillo de fijación; Roscado; Cierre por torsión; Otro
hu: Váltógomb beszerelési módja: Szorítóbilincses; Menet nélküli perselyes; Rányomós; Hernyócsavaros; Menetes; Bajonettzáras; Egyéb
th: วิธีการติดตั้งหัวเกียร์: แบบแคลมป์ยึด; ปลอกแบบไม่มีเกลียว; แบบกดลง/ดันลง; สกรูตัวหนอน; แบบมีเกลียว; ล็อกแบบบิด; อื่นๆ
nl: Pook knop montagemethode: Klembevestiging; Huls zonder schroefdraad; Opdrukken / opschuiven; Stelschroef; Met schroefdraad; Draaislot; Overig
ja: シフトノブ取付方式: クランプオン; ネジなしスリーブ; プレスオン / プッシュオン; 止めネジ; ネジ式; ツイストロック; その他
pl: Sposób montażu gałki zmiany biegów: Zaciskane; Tuleja bez gwintu; Wciskane / nasuwane; Wkręt dociskowy; Gwintowane; Zamek obrotowy (twist-lock); Inne
it: Metodo di installazione del pomello del cambio: A morsetto; Manicotto non filettato; A pressione; Vite di fermo; Filettato; A rotazione; Altro
sk-SK: Spôsob inštalácie radiacej páky: Upínacie; Puzdro bez závitu; Nalisovacie / nasadzovacie; Zaisťovacia skrutka; So závitom; Otočný zámok; Iné
tr: Vites topuzu montaj yöntemi: Kelepçeli; Dişsiz manşon; Geçmeli / basmalı; Ayar vidası; Dişli; Çevirmeli kilit; Diğer
bg-BG: Метод за монтаж на топката на скоростния лост: Със скоба; Втулка без резба; С притискане / набиване; Стопорен винт; С резба; Свързване със завъртане; Друго
lt-LT: Pavarų rankenėlės montavimo būdas: Užspaudžiamas; Mova be sriegio; Užspaudžiamas / užstumiamas; Fiksavimo varžtas; Srieginis; Pasukamas užraktas; Kita
en: Shift knob installation method: Clamp-on; Non-threaded sleeve; Press-on / push-on; Set screw; Threaded; Twist-lock; Other
sl-SI: Način namestitve glave prestavne ročice: S spono; Tulec brez navoja; Na potisk; Nastavitveni vijak; Z navojem; Zasučni zaklep; Drugo
vi: Phương pháp lắp đặt núm cần số: Dạng kẹp; Ống bọc không ren; Dạng ấn/đẩy; Vít định vị; Có ren; Khóa xoắn; Khác
da: Installationsmetode for gearknop: Til fastspænding; Muffe uden gevind; Press-on / push-on; Pinolskrue; Med gevind; Twist-lock; Andet
pt-PT: Método de instalação do botão de mudanças: De braçadeira; Manga sem rosca; De pressionar/encaixar; Parafuso de fixação; Com rosca; Bloqueio rotativo; Outro
sv: Installationsmetod för växelknopp: Fastklämning; Ogängad hylsa; Påtryckning; Stoppskruv; Gängad; Vridlås; Övrigt
ro-RO: Metodă de instalare a mânerului schimbătorului: Prin prindere; Manșon nefiletat; Prin presare / apăsare; Șurub de reglare; Filetat; Mecanism twist-lock; Altele